Massachusetts, session 194th, S881.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end of section
10M the following:-
“provided further that “tobacco use cessation counseling” shall include individual, group
and phone counseling by a physician, dentist, behavioral health counselor, mental health
counselor, certified tobacco use cessation counselor, or other qualified clinician."
of 1